Louisiana, session 2026, HB648.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:17.2(F)(2) and 17.2.1(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§17.2. Exception for certain meetings of certain public bodies
* * *
F.
* * *
(2) Any public body that is strictly advisory or that primarily focuses on
issues dealing with disabilities, or assisting military families, or issues related to
families with children under the age of five years old may conduct successive
meetings via electronic means without limitation and shall, to the extent practicable,
publish a schedule of its meetings indicating which upcoming meetings will be
conducted via electronic means and which will be conducted only in person.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-690 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 648
§17.2.1. Public body; member with a disability; member that is a parent or legal
guardian of a child under the age of five years old; member that is a provider
of early childhood supports or services
A. Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter that requires a member of
a public body to be physically present in order to be counted for a quorum and to
participate and vote in a meeting, a member of a public body who is a parent or legal
guardian of a child under the age of five years old, a provider of early childhood
supports or services, or has a disability recognized by the Americans with
Disabilities Act shall be allowed to participate and vote in a meeting via electronic
means as defined in R.S. 42:17.2.
* * *